Washington statutes.
RCW 19.250.030

Removal from directory—Reverse phone number search services.

(1) A subscriber may request that a directory provider or a radio communications service company remove their wireless phone number from a directory of any form at any time. A radio communications service company or a directory provider shall, at no cost to the subscriber, comply with the subscriber's request to remove their wireless phone number from a directory of any form within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed sixty days for printed directories and not to exceed thirty days for online or other directories.

(2) At the subscriber's request, a provider of a reverse phone number search service must allow a subscriber to perform a reverse phone number search free of charge to determine whether the subscriber's wireless phone number is listed in the reverse phone number search service. If the subscriber finds that his or her wireless phone number is contained in the reverse phone number search service, the subscriber may request that his or her wireless phone number be removed from the reverse phone number search service at any time. The provider of the reverse phone number search service must, at no cost to the subscriber, comply with the subscriber's request within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed thirty days.

[ 2009 c 401 s 2; 2008 c 271 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 271: See note following RCW 19.250.005.